Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-3001
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-3001 to 85-3006 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Career Scholarship Act.

Laws 2022, LB902, § 1.
July 1, 2023